Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.102

Analysis of evaluation systems.

(1) Representatives of the office of the superintendent of public instruction and statewide associations representing administrators, principals, human resources specialists, and certificated classroom teachers shall analyze how the evaluation systems in RCW 28A.405.100 (2) and (6) affect issues related to a change in contract status.

(2) The analysis shall be conducted during each of the phase-in years of the certificated classroom teacher and principal evaluation systems. The analysis shall include: Procedures, timelines, probationary periods, appeal procedures, and other items related to the timely exercise of employment decisions and due process provisions for certificated classroom teachers and principals.

[ 2010 c 235 s 204.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.